Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5027.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-20.10 of the General Laws entitled "Public Health and Workplace
Safety Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-20.10-6.2. Protection against exposure to second-hand marijuana smoke or vapor.
(a) Any provisions of the general laws, public laws, or regulations promulgated by any
state agency or subdivision thereof, which provisions prohibits or protects a person from exposure
to second-hand smoke, shall be deemed to be a prohibition against or protection from exposure to
second-hand marijuana smoke or vapor, regardless of how the smoke or vapor is generated.
(b) As used herein:
(1) The term "second-hand smoke or vapor or aerosol" refers to smoke or vapor or aerosol
that is exhaled by a smoker or vaper, or is given off by a tobacco or marijuana product or by a
device containing tobacco or marijuana, and which smoke or vapor or aerosol is inhaled by persons
in or near the vicinity of the smoker or vaper.
(2) The term "vaper" means a smoker of electronic nicotine delivery systems, commonly
known as "ENDS".
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000433
========